Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-2604
Consumer reporting agency; release of credit report or other information prohibited without authorization.

If a security freeze is in place with respect to a consumer's or protected consumer's file, the consumer reporting agency shall not release a credit report or any other information derived from the file to a third party without the prior express authorization of the consumer, protected consumer, or representative. This section does not prevent a consumer reporting agency from advising a third party that a security freeze is in effect with respect to a consumer's or protected consumer's file.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 5.